Georgia, session 2025_26, SB61.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
23 SECTION 1.
24 Article 6 of Chapter 11 of Title 15 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
25 delinquency, is amended by revising Code Section 15-11-560, relating to concurrent and
26 original jurisdiction of superior court, as follows:
27 "15-11-560.
28 (a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, the court shall have
29 concurrent jurisdiction with the superior court over a child who is alleged to have
30 committed a delinquent act which would be considered a crime if tried in a superior court
31 and for which an adult may be punished by loss of life, imprisonment for life without
32 possibility of parole, or confinement for life in a penal institution.
33 (b) The superior court shall have exclusive original jurisdiction over the trial of any
34 child 13 to 17 years of age who is alleged to have committed any of the following offenses:
35 (1) Murder;
36 (2) Murder in the second degree;
37 (3) Voluntary manslaughter;
38 (4) Rape;
39 (5) Aggravated sodomy;
40 (6) Aggravated child molestation;
41 (7) Aggravated sexual battery;
42 (8) Armed robbery if committed with a firearm;
S. B. 61
- 2 -

25 SB 61/CSFA
43 (9) Aggravated assault if committed with a firearm upon a public safety officer as such
44 acts are prohibited under subsection (c) of Code Section 16-5-21; or
45 (10) Aggravated battery upon a public safety officer as such acts are prohibited under
46 subsection (c) of Code Section 16-5-24;
47 (11) A terroristic act upon a school in violation of subsection (c) of Code
48 Section 20-2-1181.1;
49 (12) Attempt to commit or conspiracy to commit murder; or
50 (13) Attempt to commit or conspiracy to commit any of the offenses provided for in
51 paragraphs (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), and (11) of this subsection.
52 (c) The granting of bail or pretrial release of a child charged with an offense enumerated
53 in subsection (b) of this Code section shall be governed by the provisions of Code
54 Section 17-6-1.
55 (d)(1) At any time before indictment, the district attorney may, after investigation and
56 for cause, decline prosecution in the superior court of a child 13 to 17 years of age alleged
57 to have committed an offense specified in subsection (b) of this Code section. Upon
58 declining such prosecution in the superior court, the district attorney shall cause a petition
59 to be filed in the appropriate juvenile court for adjudication within 72 hours if the child
60 is in detention or 30 days if the child is not in detention.
61 (2)(A) Except as provided in paragraph (8) of subsection (b) of Code
62 Section 15-11-602 or subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, any case transferred by the
63 district attorney to the juvenile court pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to the
64 class A designated felony act provisions of Code Section 15-11-602, and the transfer
65 of the case from superior court to juvenile court shall constitute notice to such child that
66 such case is subject to the class A designated felony act provisions of Code
67 Section 15-11-602.
68 (B) Any case transferred by the district attorney to the juvenile court pursuant to this
69 subsection involving a child 13 to 17 years of age alleged to have committed an offense
S. B. 61
- 3 -

25 SB 61/CSFA
70 specified in paragraph (13) of subsection (b) of this Code section shall not be subject
71 to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
72 (e)(1) After indictment, the superior court may after investigation transfer to the juvenile
73 court any case involving a child 13 to 17 years of age alleged to have committed any act
74 described in paragraph (3), (5), (6), (7), (9), or (10), (11), (12), or (13) of subsection (b)
75 of this Code section. In considering the transfer of such case, the court shall consider the
76 criteria set forth in Code Section 15-11-562. Any such transfer shall be appealable by the
77 State of Georgia pursuant to Code Section 5-7-1. Upon such a transfer by the superior
78 court, jurisdiction shall vest in the juvenile court and jurisdiction of the superior court
79 shall terminate.
80 (2)(A) Except as provided in paragraph (8) of subsection (b) of Code
81 Section 15-11-602 or subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, any case transferred by the
82 superior court to the juvenile court pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to the
83 class A designated felony act provisions of Code Section 15-11-602, and the transfer
84 of the case from superior court to juvenile court shall constitute notice to such child that
85 such case is subject to the class A designated felony act provisions of Code
86 Section 15-11-602.
87 (B) Any case transferred by the superior court to the juvenile court pursuant to this
88 subsection involving a child 13 to 17 years of age alleged to have committed an offense
89 specified in paragraph (13) of subsection (b) of this Code section shall not be subject
90 to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
91 (f) The superior court may transfer any case involving a child 13 to 17 years of age alleged
92 to have committed any offense enumerated in subsection (b) of this Code section and
93 convicted of a lesser included offense not included in subsection (b) of this Code section
94 to the juvenile court of the county of such child's residence for disposition. Upon such a
95 transfer by the superior court, jurisdiction shall vest in the juvenile court and jurisdiction
96 of the superior court shall terminate.
S. B. 61
- 4 -

25 SB 61/CSFA
97 (g) Within 30 days of any proceeding in which a child 13 to 17 years of age is convicted
98 of certain offenses over which the superior court has original jurisdiction as provided in
99 subsection (b) of this Code section or adjudicated as a delinquent child on the basis of
100 conduct which if committed by an adult would constitute such offenses, the superior court
101 shall provide written notice to the school superintendent or his or her designee of the school
102 in which such child is enrolled or, if the information is known, of the school in which such
103 child plans to be enrolled at a future date. Such notice shall include the specific criminal
104 offense that such child committed. The local school system to which such child is assigned
105 may request further information from the court's file.
106 (h) As used in this Code section, the term 'firearm' means a handgun, rifle, shotgun, or
107 other weapon which will or can be converted to expel a projectile by the action of an
108 explosive or electrical charge."
109 SECTION 2.
110 Said article is further amended by revising subsection (a) of Code Section 15-11-562, relating
111 to transfer criteria and written report, as follows:
112 "(a) The criteria that the juvenile court shall consider in determining whether to transfer
113 an alleged delinquent child as set forth in subsection (a) of Code Section 15-11-561 to
114 superior court and the criteria that the superior court shall consider in determining whether
115 to transfer any case involving a child 13 to 17 years of age alleged to have committed any
116 act described in paragraph (3), (5), (6), (7), (9), or (10), (11), (12), or (13) of subsection (b)
117 of Code Section 15-11-560 to juvenile court as set forth in subsection (e) of Code
118 Section 15-11-560 includes, but shall not be limited to:
119 (1) The age of such child;
120 (2) The seriousness of the alleged offense, especially if personal injury resulted;
121 (3) Whether the protection of the community requires transfer of jurisdiction;
S. B. 61
- 5 -

25 SB 61/CSFA
122 (4) Whether the alleged offense involved violence or was committed in an aggressive or
123 premeditated manner;
124 (5) The impact of the alleged offense on the alleged victim, including the permanence
125 of any physical or emotional injury sustained, health care expenses incurred, and lost
126 earnings suffered;
127 (6) The culpability of such child including such child's level of planning and
128 participation in the alleged offense;
129 (7) Whether the alleged offense is a part of a repetitive pattern of offenses which
130 indicates that such child may be beyond rehabilitation in the juvenile justice system;
131 (8) The record and history of such child, including experience with the juvenile justice
132 system, other courts, supervision, commitments to juvenile institutions, and other
133 placements;
134 (9) The sophistication and maturity of such child as determined by consideration of his
135 or her home and environmental situation, emotional condition, and pattern of living;
136 (10) The program and facilities available to the juvenile court in considering disposition;
137 and
138 (11) Whether or not a child can benefit from the treatment or rehabilitative programs
139 available to the juvenile court."
140 SECTION 3.
141 Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to elementary and
142 secondary education, is amended by revising Code Section 20-2-701, relating to
143 responsibility for reporting truants to juvenile or other courts, as follows:
144 "20-2-701.
145 (a) Local school superintendents as applied to private schools, the Department of
146 Education as applied to home study programs, or visiting teachers and attendance officers
147 as applied to public schools, after written notice to the parent or guardian of a child, shall
S. B. 61
- 6 -

25 SB 61/CSFA
148 report to the juvenile or other court having jurisdiction under Chapter 11 of Title 15 any
149 child who is absent from a public or private school or a home study program in violation
150 of this subpart. If the judge of the court places such child in a home or in a public or
151 private institution pursuant to Chapter 11 of Title 15, school shall be provided for such
152 child. The Department of Education shall coordinate with local school superintendents
153 with respect to attendance records and notification for students in home study programs.
154 (b)(1) Except as prohibited by Code Section 15-11-710, each superior court and juvenile
155 court in this state and the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Department of Human
156 Services, and the Division of Family and Children Services shall notify the local school
157 system or other public school in which a child is enrolled or would be enrolled by virtue
158 of his or her residence when such court or state agency has ordered that such child shall
159 be subject to electronic monitoring, as such term is defined in Code Section 42-3-111; an
160 intensive supervision program; or a home confinement program.
161 (2) A local school system or public school that receives information provided for in
162 paragraph (1) of this subsection shall:
163 (A) Maintain the confidential nature of such information; and
164 (B) Be authorized to utilize such information for purposes of promoting and protecting
165 the safety of such child and the school community.
166 (3) There shall be no presumption that a local school system will utilize the information
167 provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection to the detriment of such child."
168 SECTION 4.
169 Said chapter is further amended in Article 27, relating to loitering at or disrupting schools,
170 by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
171 "20-2-1181.1.
172 (a) As used in this Code section, the term:
S. B. 61
- 7 -

25 SB 61/CSFA
173 (1) 'Hazardous substance' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
174 Section 12-8-92.
175 (2) 'Weapon' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-5-44.1. Such
176 term shall include, but shall not be limited to, each item included in paragraph (4) of
177 subsection (a) of Code Section 16-11-127.1.
178 (b) A person commits the offense of a terroristic threat of a school when he or she
179 threatens to commit any crime of violence, release any hazardous substance, or burn or
180 damage property and such threat is made:
181 (1) With the purpose of terrorizing another who at the time of such threat is physically
182 present:
183 (A) On public or private school operated property, including, but not limited to, school
184 buildings and school grounds;
185 (B) On a school bus or other vehicle furnished by a public or private school for the
186 transportation of students; or
187 (C) At a public or private school sponsored activity;
188 (2) With the purpose of causing the evacuation of:
189 (A) Public or private school operated property, including, but not limited to, school
190 buildings and school grounds; or
191 (B) A school bus or other vehicle furnished by a public or private school for the
192 transportation of students; or
193 (3) In reckless disregard of the risk of causing the terror or evacuation described in
194 paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection.
195 (c) A person commits the offense of a terroristic act upon a school when he or she commits
196 an act of using a weapon or flaming symbol or flambeau, releasing any hazardous
197 substance or any simulated hazardous substance under the guise of a hazardous substance,
198 or, while not in the commission of a lawful act, shooting at or throwing an object at a
S. B. 61
- 8 -

25 SB 61/CSFA
199 conveyance which is being operated or which is occupied by passengers and such act is
200 committed:
201 (1) With the purpose of terrorizing another who at the time of such act is physically
202 present:
203 (A) On public or private school operated property, including, but not limited to, school
204 buildings and school grounds;
205 (B) On a school bus or other vehicle furnished by a public or private school for the
206 transportation of students; or
207 (C) At a public or private school sponsored activity;
208 (2) With the purpose of causing the evacuation of:
209 (A) Public or private school operated property, including, but not limited to, school
210 buildings and school grounds; or
211 (B) A school bus or other vehicle furnished by a public or private school for the
212 transportation of students; or
213 (3) In reckless disregard of the risk of causing the terror or evacuation described in
214 paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection.
215 (d)(1) A person convicted of the offense of a terroristic threat of a school shall be
216 punished as for a misdemeanor; provided, however, that, if the threat suggested the death
217 of any person, the person shall be guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be
218 punished by a fine of not more than $1,000.00, imprisonment for not less than one nor
219 more than five years, or both; and provided, further, that, if any person suffers a serious
220 physical injury as a direct result of a threat giving rise to a conviction under
221 subsection (b) of this Code section, the person shall be guilty of a felony and upon
222 conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not more than $250,000.00,
223 imprisonment for not less than five nor more than 40 years, or both.
224 (2) A person convicted of the offense of a terroristic act upon a school shall be guilty of
225 a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not more
S. B. 61
- 9 -

25 SB 61/CSFA
226 than $5,000.00, imprisonment for not less than one nor more than ten years, or both;
227 provided, however, that, if any person suffers a serious physical injury as a direct result
228 of an act giving rise to a conviction under subsection (c) of this Code section, the person
229 shall be guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not
230 more than $250,000.00, imprisonment for not less than five nor more than 40 years, or
231 both."
232 SECTION 5.
233 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 20-2-1185, relating to school
234 safety plans and drills, as follows:
235 "20-2-1185.
236 (a) As used in this Code section, the term 'site threat assessment' means conducting an
237 evaluation for purposes of most effectively preventing, reducing, or responding to threats
238 of violence, mass casualty incidents and other acts of terrorism, natural disasters, and
239 hazardous materials accidents.
240 (b)(1) By June 1 of each year, each public school in this state shall have performed a site
241 threat assessment of its buildings, facilities, and campuses by a law enforcement agency
242 or other appropriate government agency or by an individual or entity certified and
243 approved pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection. Such site threat assessment shall
244 inform the preparation and maintenance of a school safety plan as provided for in
245 subsection (c) of this Code section.
246 (2) The Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency shall be
247 exclusively authorized to certify and approve private individuals and entities to provide
248 site threat assessments to public schools in this state. Beginning January 1, 2026, the
249 Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency shall maintain a list
250 of individuals and entities that are certified and approved for purposes of this Code
251 section to provide site threat assessments to public schools.
S. B. 61
- 10 -

25 SB 61/CSFA
252 (c)(1) Each Every public school in this state shall prepare and annually review and
253 update as necessary a school safety plan to help curb the growing incidence of violence
254 in schools, to respond effectively to such incidents, and to provide a safe learning
255 environment for Georgia's children, teachers, and other school personnel. Such plan shall
256 also address preparedness for natural disasters, hazardous materials or radiological
257 accidents, acts of violence, and acts of terrorism. School safety plans of public schools
258 shall be prepared with input from students enrolled in that school, parents or legal
259 guardians of such students, teachers in that school, community leaders, other school
260 employees and school district employees, and local law enforcement, juvenile court, fire
261 service, public safety, and emergency management agencies. As part of such plans,
262 public schools shall provide for the coordination with local law enforcement agencies and
263 the local juvenile court system. Such plans of public schools shall be submitted to the
264 local law enforcement agency designated as having approval authority by the local board
265 of education.
266 (2) School safety plans shall include, at a minimum, the following strategy areas:
267 (1)(A) Training school administrators, teachers, and support staff, including, but not
268 limited to, school resource officers, security officers, secretaries, custodians, and bus
269 drivers, on school violence prevention, school security, school threat assessment,
270 mental health awareness, and school emergency planning best practices;
271 (2)(B) Evaluating and refining school security measures;
272 (3)(C) Updating and exercising school emergency preparedness plans;
273 (4)(D) Strengthening partnerships with public safety officials; and
274 (5)(E) Creating enhanced crisis communications plans and social media strategies;
275 (F) Addressing security issues in school safety zones, as defined in Code
276 Section 16-11-127.1;
277 (G) Addressing security issues involving school functions held during noninstructional
278 hours; and
S. B. 61
- 11 -

25 SB 61/CSFA
279 (H) Addressing security issues involving the transportation of students to and from
280 school and school functions when such transportation is furnished by the school.
281 (3) The school safety plan of each public school shall be submitted to the Department of
282 Education after the approval of such plan by a local law enforcement agency designated
283 as having approval authority by the local board of education. The Department of
284 Education shall publish on its public website a list of all public schools that have
285 completed and all public schools that are delinquent in completing the site threat
286 assessment required in subsection (b) of this Code section.
287 (d) School safety plans of private schools may be prepared with input from students
288 enrolled in that school, parents or legal guardians of such students, teachers in that school,
289 other school employees, and local law enforcement, fire service, public safety, and
290 emergency management agencies. Such plans shall be reviewed and, if necessary, updated
291 annually. Such plans of public schools shall be submitted to the local emergency
292 management agency, the local law enforcement agency, and the Georgia Emergency
293 Management and Homeland Security Agency for approval.
294 (b)(e) A public school may request funding assistance from the state for facilities,
295 technology, or other safety improvements or initiatives, such as the installation of safety
296 equipment, including, but not limited to, video surveillance cameras, metal detectors,
297 alarms, communications systems, building access controls, and other similar security
298 devices. The Department of Education shall establish criteria that will be applied in
299 reviewing funding requests pursuant to this subsection which shall take into consideration
300 the physical security needs of the public school in evaluating how the school safety plan
301 and funding request will support such physical security needs. Funding may be provided
302 to a public school in accordance with a school safety plan prepared by the school and
303 approved by the local board of education, the local law enforcement agency, the
304 Department of Education, and the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland
305 Security Agency as provided for in subsection (c) of this Code section; provided, however,
S. B. 61
- 12 -

25 SB 61/CSFA
306 that a public school shall be required to match the state funding with local funds unless the
307 school can demonstrate a substantial hardship.
308 (c) School safety plans prepared by public schools shall address security issues in school
309 safety zones as defined in Code Section 16-11-127.1. School safety plans should also
310 address security issues involving the transportation of pupils to and from school and school
311 functions when such transportation is furnished by the school or school system and school
312 functions held during noninstructional hours.
313 (d)(f) The Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency shall provide
314 training and technical assistance to public school systems, and may provide this same
315 training and technical assistance to private school systems and independent private schools
316 throughout this state in the area of emergency management and safe school operations.
317 This training and technical assistance shall include, but not be limited to, crisis response
318 team development, site surveys and safety audits site threat assessments, crisis management
319 planning, exercise design, safe school planning, emergency operations planning, search and
320 seizure, bomb threat management, and model school safety plans.
321 (e)(g)(1) Every public school shall conduct drills with students, school administrators,
322 teachers, and other school personnel on the execution of school safety plans in such form
323 and at such intervals based upon guidance from the Georgia Emergency Management and
324 Homeland Security Agency.
325 (2) By October 1 of each school year, every public school shall conduct an intruder alert
326 drill for students, school administrators, teachers, and other school personnel based upon
327 guidance from the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency.
328 Each local school system or public school governing body shall promptly report to the
329 Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency the completion of such
330 drills. All students shall participate in intruder alert drills provided for in this paragraph;
331 provided, however, that the governing body of a local school system or public school may
332 provide an option for a child's parent or legal guardian to elect, in writing, that such child
S. B. 61
- 13 -

25 SB 61/CSFA
333 not participate in intruder alert drills. As used in this paragraph, the term 'intruder alert
334 drill' means a set of procedures designed to familiarize the occupants of a building with
335 ways to protect themselves against potential threats posed by an intruder who possesses
336 or is suspected of possessing a weapon, as defined in Code Section 20-2-742."
337 SECTION 6.
338 This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
339 without such approval; provided, however, that Section 4 of this Act shall be applicable to
340 offenses committed on or after such date.
341 SECTION 7.
342 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 61
- 14 -